Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 55. Sentencing and Probation.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 166, SLA 1978 (HB 661), see 1978 Senate Journal Supplement No. 47 (June 12, 1978).

Sec. 12.55.005.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide the means for determining the appropriate sentence to be imposed upon conviction of an offense. The legislature finds that the elimination of unjustified disparity in sentences and the attainment of reasonable uniformity in sentences can best be achieved through a sentencing framework fixed by statute as provided in this chapter. In imposing sentence, the court shall consider

the seriousness of the defendant’s present offense in relation to other offenses;

the prior criminal history of the defendant and the likelihood of rehabilitation;

the need to confine the defendant to prevent further harm to the public;

the circumstances of the offense and the extent to which the offense harmed the victim or endangered the public safety or order;

the effect of the sentence to be imposed in deterring the defendant or other members of society from future criminal conduct;

the effect of the sentence to be imposed as a community condemnation of the criminal act and as a reaffirmation of societal norms; and

the restoration of the victim and the community.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 103 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: VI, 18-22.

Sec. 12.55.010.
Imprisonment on judgment for payment of fine. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978. For present provisions, see AS 12.55.035(a).]

Sec. 12.55.011.
Victim and community involvement in sentencing.

A court, when considering the sentence to be imposed under this chapter for an offense other than a violation of AS 11.41, AS

11.46.400

, or a crime involving domestic violence, may permit the victim and the offender to submit a sentence for the court’s review based upon a negotiated agreement between the victim and the offender, or between the offender and the community if there is no victim. The court may, with the consent of the victim and the offender, impose the sentence that has been determined by the negotiated agreement between the offender and the victim, or between the offender and the community if there is no victim, if that sentence otherwise complies with this chapter and accomplishes the goals of restoration of the victim and the community and rehabilitation of the offender. Before accepting a negotiated agreement, the court shall determine that the victim has not been intimidated or coerced in reaching the agreement. In this section, “community” has the meaning determined by the court.

At the time of sentencing, the court shall, if practicable, provide the victim with a form that

provides information on

whom the victim should contact if the victim has questions about the sentence or release of the offender;

the potential for release of the offender on furlough, probation, or parole or for good time credit; and

allows the victim to update the victim’s contact information with the court, the Victim Information and Notification Everyday service, and the Department of Corrections.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 2000; am § 65 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 8 ch 13 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 9, 2016, added (b).

The 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, in (b), in the introductory language, inserted “, if practicable,” following “the court shall”.

Sec. 12.55.015.
Authorized sentences; forfeiture.

Except as limited by AS

12.55.125

—

12.55.175

, the court, in imposing sentence on a defendant convicted of an offense, may singly or in combination

impose a fine when authorized by law and as provided in AS

12.55.035

;

order the defendant to be placed on probation under conditions specified by the court that may include provision for active supervision;

impose a definite term of periodic imprisonment, but only if an employment obligation of the defendant preexisted sentencing and the defendant receives a composite sentence of not more than two years to serve;

impose a definite term of continuous imprisonment;

order the defendant to make restitution under AS

12.55.045

;

order the defendant to carry out a continuous or periodic program of community work under AS

12.55.055

;

suspend execution of all or a portion of the sentence imposed under AS

12.55.080

;

suspend entry of judgment under AS

12.55.078

or suspend imposition of sentence under AS

12.55.085

;

order the forfeiture to the commissioner of public safety or a municipal law enforcement agency of a deadly weapon that was in the actual possession of or used by the defendant during the commission of an offense described in AS 11.41, AS 11.46, AS 11.56, or AS 11.61;

order the defendant, while incarcerated, to participate in or comply with the treatment plan of a rehabilitation program that is related to the defendant’s offense or to the defendant’s rehabilitation if the program is made available to the defendant by the Department of Corrections;

order the forfeiture to the state of a motor vehicle, weapon, electronic communication device, or money or other valuables, used in or obtained through an offense that was committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with a criminal street gang;

order the defendant to have no contact, either directly or indirectly, with a victim or witness of the offense until the defendant is unconditionally discharged;

order the defendant to refrain from consuming alcoholic beverages for a period of time.

The court, in exercising sentencing discretion as provided in this chapter, shall impose a sentence involving imprisonment when

the defendant deserves to be imprisoned, considering the seriousness of the present offense and the defendant’s prior criminal history, and imprisonment is equitable considering sentences imposed for other offenses and other defendants under similar circumstances;

imprisonment is necessary to protect the public from further harm by the defendant; or

sentences of lesser severity have been repeatedly imposed for substantially similar offenses in the past and have proven ineffective in deterring the defendant from further criminal conduct.

In addition to the penalties authorized by this section, the court may invoke any authority conferred by law to order a forfeiture of property, suspend or revoke a license, remove a person from office, or impose any other civil penalty. When forfeiting property under this subsection, a court may award to a municipal law enforcement agency that participated in the arrest or conviction of the defendant, the seizure of property, or the identification of property for seizure, (1) the property if the property is worth $5,000 or less and is not money or some other thing that is divisible, or (2) up to 75 percent of the property or the value of the property if the property is worth more than $5,000 or is money or some other thing that is divisible. In determining the percentage a municipal law enforcement agency may receive under this subsection, the court shall consider the municipal law enforcement agency’s total involvement in the case relative to the involvement of the state.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 188 SLA 1990.]

If the defendant is ordered to serve a definite term of imprisonment, the court may recommend that the defendant serve all or part of the term

in a correctional restitution center;

by electronic monitoring.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the court shall order the forfeiture to the commissioner of public safety or a municipal law enforcement agency of a deadly weapon that was in the actual possession of or used by the defendant during the commission of a crime involving domestic violence.

Unless a defendant is ineligible for a deduction under AS 33.20, when a defendant is sentenced to a term of imprisonment of two years or more, the sentence consists of two parts: (1) a minimum term of imprisonment that is equal to not less than two-thirds of the total term of imprisonment; and (2) a maximum term of supervised release on mandatory parole that is equal to not more than one-third of the total term of imprisonment; the amount of time that the inmate actually serves in imprisonment and on supervised release is subject to the provisions of AS

33.20.010

—

33.20.060

.

In addition to penalties authorized by this section, the court shall order a person convicted of an offense requiring the state to collect a blood sample, oral sample, or both, for the deoxyribonucleic acid identification registration system under AS

44.41.035

to submit to the collection of

the sample or samples when requested by a health care professional acting on behalf of the state to provide the sample or samples; or

an oral sample when requested by a juvenile or adult correctional, probation, or parole officer, or a peace officer.

In addition to penalties authorized by this section, the court may order a defendant convicted of a violation of AS

11.41.410

or

11.41.434

where the victim of the offense was under 13 years of age to be subject to electronic monitoring up to the maximum length of probation on the person’s release from a correctional facility.

Nothing in (a)(13) of this section limits or restricts the authority of a court to order a person to refrain from the consumption of alcohol as a condition of sentence or probation.

In making a determination under (a)(12) of this section for a defendant convicted of a crime involving a sex offense as defined in AS

12.63.100

or a crime involving domestic violence as defined in AS

18.66.990

, there is a presumption that, unless the court finds on the record that contact between a defendant and the victim of the offense is necessary, the court shall order the defendant to have no contact, either directly or indirectly, with the victim until the defendant is unconditionally discharged.

In this section “deadly weapon” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 37 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 72 SLA 1985; am §§ 2, 3 ch 169 SLA 1988; am §§ 1, 12 ch 188 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1994; am § 7 ch 60 SLA 1996; am § 12 ch 64 SLA 1996; am §§ 5, 6 ch 129 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1997; am § 6 ch 86 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 95 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 116 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 2 SLA 2005; am § 2 ch 42 SLA 2008; am § 4 ch 33 SLA 2009; am §§ 17, 18 ch 19 SLA 2010; am § 9 ch 13 SLA 2017; am § 62 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (f) was enacted as (g). Relettered in 1996, at which time former (f) was relettered as (g). Subsection (g) was enacted as (h) in 1997 and subsection (h) was enacted as (i) in 1998. Both were relettered in 1998, at which time former subsection (g) (relettered from (f) in 1996) was relettered as (i). Subsection (i) was enacted as subsection (j); relettered in 2008, at which time former subsection (i) was relettered as (j), then relettered as (k) [now (

l

)] in 2010; subsection (j) was enacted as (k) and relettered in 2010.

Subsection (k) was enacted as (

l

). Relettered in 2019, at which time former (k) was relettered as (

l

).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective September 14, 2009, repealed (a)(1)(B).

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), deleted the (1)(A) and (1)(B) designations, added (a)(13); added (k) (now (j)).

The 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, in (a)(8), inserted “entry of judgment under AS

12.55.078

or suspend” near the beginning.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, added (

l

) [now (k)].

Editor's notes. —

Section 15, ch. 95, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 enactment of subsection (h) applies “to offenses committed before, on, or after September 10, 1998.”

Section 6(b), ch. 42, SLA 2008 provides that (j) of this section, relettered as (i), “applies to persons convicted of offenses on or after January 1, 2009.”

Section 142(b), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 addition of (

l

) [now (k)] of this section applies “to sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, (May 29, 1980) or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, (May 29, 1980).

Sec. 12.55.020.
Enforcing judgment to pay money. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For present provisions, see AS 12.55.025(f), AS 12.55.035(a), (d) and AS 12.55.051.]

Sec. 12.55.022.
Victim impact statement.

As part of the presentence report prepared on each felony offender, the probation officer shall prepare a victim impact statement reporting the following information:

the financial, emotional, and medical effects of the offense on the victim;

the need of the victim for restitution; and

any other information required by the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 154 SLA 1984)

Cross references. —

Definition of “victim” — AS

12.55.185

Restitution — AS

12.55.045

Original Code Provision — None.

Collateral references. —

Victim impact evidence in capital sentencing hearings — post-

Payne v. Tennessee

. 79 ALR5th 33.

Sec. 12.55.023.
Participation by victim in sentencing.

If a victim requests, the prosecuting attorney shall provide the victim, before the sentencing hearing, with a copy of the following portions of the presentence report:

the summary of the offense prepared by the Department of Corrections;

the defendant’s version of the offense;

all statements and summaries of statements of the victim;

the sentence recommendation of the Department of Corrections; and

letters of support submitted to the court for consideration.

A victim may submit to the sentencing court a written statement that the victim believes is relevant to the sentencing decision and may give sworn testimony or make an unsworn oral presentation to the court at the sentencing hearing. If there are numerous victims, the court may reasonably limit the number of victims who may give sworn testimony or make an unsworn oral presentation during the hearing. When requested by the victim of a felony or a class A misdemeanor, if the class A misdemeanor is a crime involving domestic violence or a crime against a person under AS 11.41, when the victim does not submit a statement, give testimony, or make an oral presentation, the victims’ advocate may submit a written statement or make an unsworn oral presentation at the sentencing hearing on behalf of the victim.

History.

(§ 4 ch 59 SLA 1989; am § 6 ch 57 SLA 1991; am § 7 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 17 ch 43 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

Definition of “victim” — AS

12.55.185

Designation of representative — AS

12.55.172

Original Code Provision — None.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(5) and made a related change.

Sec. 12.55.025.
Sentencing procedures.

When imposing a sentence for conviction of a felony offense or a sentence of imprisonment exceeding 90 days or upon a conviction of a violation of AS 04, a regulation adopted under AS 04, or an ordinance adopted in conformity with AS

04.21.010

, the court shall prepare, as a part of the record, a sentencing report that includes the following:

a verbatim record of the sentencing hearing and any other in-court sentencing procedures;

findings on material issues of fact and on factual questions required to be determined as a prerequisite to the selection of the sentence imposed;

a clear statement of the terms of the sentence imposed; if a term of imprisonment is imposed, the statement must include

the approximate minimum term the defendant is expected to serve before being released or placed on mandatory parole if the defendant is eligible for and does not forfeit good conduct deductions under AS

33.20.010

; and

if applicable, the approximate minimum term of imprisonment the defendant must serve before becoming eligible for release on discretionary parole;

any recommendations as to the place of confinement or the manner of treatment; and

in the case of a conviction for a felony offense, information assessing

the financial, emotional, and medical effects of the offense on the victim;

the need of the victim for restitution; and

any other information required by the court.

The sentencing report required under (a) of this section shall be furnished within 30 days after imposition of sentence to the Department of Law, the defendant, the Department of Corrections, the state Board of Parole if the defendant will be eligible for parole, and to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board if the defendant is to be sentenced for a conviction of a violation of AS 04, a regulation adopted under AS 04, or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.21.010

.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, when a defendant is sentenced to imprisonment, the term of confinement commences on the date of imposition of sentence unless the court specifically provides that the defendant must report to serve the sentence on another date. If the court provides another date to begin the term of confinement, the court shall provide the defendant with written notice of the date, time, and location of the correctional facility to which the defendant must report. A defendant shall receive credit for time spent in custody pending trial, sentencing, or appeal, if the detention was in connection with the offense for which the sentence was imposed. A defendant may not receive credit for more than the actual time spent in custody pending trial, sentencing, or appeal. The time during which a defendant is voluntarily absent from official detention after the defendant has been sentenced may not be credited toward service of the sentence.

A sentence of imprisonment shall be stayed if an appeal is taken and the defendant is admitted to bail. If an appeal is taken and the defendant is not admitted to bail, the Department of Corrections shall designate the facility in which the defendant shall be detained pending appeal or admission to bail.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 125 SLA 2004.]

A sentence that the defendant pay money, either as a fine or in restitution or both, constitutes a lien in the same manner as a judgment for money entered in a civil action. Nothing in this section limits the authority of the court to otherwise enforce payment of a fine or restitution.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 125 SLA 2004.]

[Repealed, § 7 ch 125 SLA 2004.]

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the preponderance of the evidence standard of proof applies to sentencing proceedings.

The approximate minimum terms provided under (a)(3) of this section in the sentencing report are for information purposes only. The approximate minimum terms are not part of the sentence imposed and do not form a basis for review or appeal of the sentence imposed or provide a defendant with a right to any specific term of imprisonment or supervised release on mandatory parole.

If a defendant intends to claim credit under AS

12.55.027

toward a sentence of imprisonment for time spent in a treatment program as a condition of bail in connection with an offense for which the defendant is being sentenced, the defendant shall file notice with the court and the prosecutor 10 days before the sentencing hearing. The notice shall include the number of days the defendant is claiming. The defendant must prove by a preponderance of evidence that the requirements of AS

12.55.027

are met before credit may be awarded. Except as provided in (l) of this section, except for good cause, a court may not consider a request for credit made under this subsection more than 90 days after the sentencing hearing.

If a defendant intends to claim credit under AS

12.55.027

toward a sentence of imprisonment for time spent in a treatment program as a condition of bail while pending appeal, the defendant shall file notice with the court and the prosecutor not later than 90 days after return of the case to the trial court following appeal. The notice shall include the number of days the defendant is claiming. The defendant must prove by a preponderance of evidence that the requirements of AS

12.55.027

are met before credit may be awarded. Except for good cause, the court may not consider a request for credit made under this subsection after the deadline.

When imposing a sentence for conviction of a felony offense or a sentence of imprisonment exceeding 90 days or, upon a conviction of a violation of AS 04, a regulation adopted under AS 04, or an ordinance adopted in conformity with AS

04.21.010

, the court shall orally state on the record the terms of the sentence of imprisonment imposed and the approximate minimum sentence that must be served before the defendant may be eligible for mandatory parole and that the period of active incarceration may be reduced under other provisions of law.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; §§ 7, 8 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 24, 25 ch 143 SLA 1982; am E.O. No. 55, §§ 6, 7 (1984); am § 2 ch 154 SLA 1984; am §§ 5, 6 ch 66 SLA 1988; am §§ 21, 22 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 7 SLA 1996; am §§ 3, 4 ch 37 SLA 1997; am § 13 ch 81 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 124 SLA 2000; am §§ 2, 7 ch 125 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 2 SLA 2005; am § 8 ch 70 SLA 2012; am § 18 ch 43 SLA 2013; am §§
66, 67 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 28 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§
63, 64 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provisions — AS 11.05.040; AS 11.05.050; AS

12.55.020

.

TD: VI, 23-26.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(d)(1) and (2), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For eligibility for discretionary parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (i), substituted “Except as otherwise provided in this chapter” for “Except as provided by AS

12.55.125(a)(3)

,

12.55.145(d)

,

12.55.155(f)

, and

12.55.165

”.

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (k) and (

l

).

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a)(3)(B), inserted “or administrative” preceding “parole”; in (c), inserted “including a technical violation of probation as provided in AS

12.55.110

” following “sentence was imposed”.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (a)(3)(B), deleted “or administrative” following “release on discretionary”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (c), substituted “for which the sentence was imposed” for “for which sentence was imposed including a technical violation of probation as provided in AS

12.55.110

”; and added (m).

Editor's notes. —

Section 17, ch. 70, SLA 2012 provides that the 2012 amendment to subsection (i) applies “to proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2012 for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2012.”

Under sec. 46(c), ch. 43, SLA 2013, subsections (k) and (

l

), added by sec. 18, ch. 43, SLA 2013, apply to sentencing hearings occurring on or after July 1, 2013.

Section 142(e), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (c) of this section applies “to probation ordered before, on, or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Section 142(j), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 addition of (m) of this section applies “to sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019, for offenses committed before, on, or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For sectional analysis of CS SSSB 239, the predecessor of FCCSSB 239 (ch. 131, SLA 1980), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement No. 23, April 1, 1980.

For House letter of intent on ch. 66, SLA 1988 (CSHB 237 (Jud)), which amended this section, see 1988 House Journal 2330-2333.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Authority exists to both award and forfeit statutory good time for pretrial detainees. February 18, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 12.55.027.
Credit for time spent toward service of a sentence of imprisonment.

A court may grant a defendant credit toward a sentence of imprisonment for time spent in a treatment program that furthers the reformation and rehabilitation of the defendant if the court finds that the program places a substantial restriction on the defendant’s freedom of movement and behavior and is consistent with this section.

A court may only grant credit under this section

in the amount of one day of credit toward a sentence of imprisonment for each full day the defendant spent in a treatment program; and

if the court ordered the defendant to participate in and comply with the conditions of the treatment program before the defendant entered the program.

In granting credit toward a sentence of imprisonment for time spent in a treatment program, a court shall consider the following factors:

the restrictions on the defendant's freedom of movement and behavior;

the circumstances under which the defendant was enrolled in the program;

the residency requirements of the program;

the physical custody and supervision of the defendant at the program;

the circumstances under which the defendant is permitted to leave the program's facility;

the rules of the program and the requirement that the defendant obey the orders of persons who have immediate custody or control over the defendant;

the sanctions on the defendant for violating the program's rules or orders;

whether the defendant is subject to arrest for leaving the program's facility without permission;

the use of an electronic monitoring device;

whether the program provides substance abuse treatment;

the use of other technology that monitors or restricts the defendant's movement and behavior;

other factors that support the court's finding that the program places a substantial restriction on the defendant's freedom of movement and behavior;

other factors that support the court's finding that the program furthers the reformation and rehabilitation of the defendant.

A court may grant credit against a sentence of imprisonment for time spent under electronic monitoring if the person has not committed a criminal offense while under electronic monitoring and the court imposes restrictions on the person’s freedom of movement and behavior while under the electronic monitoring program, including requiring the person to be confined to a residence except for a

court appearance;

meeting with counsel; or

period during which the person is at a location ordered by the court for the purposes of employment, attending educational or vocational training, performing community volunteer work, or attending a rehabilitative activity or medical appointment.

If a defendant intends to claim credit toward a sentence of imprisonment for time spent in a treatment program or under electronic monitoring either as a condition of probation or as a condition of bail release after a petition to revoke probation has been filed, the defendant shall file notice with the court and the prosecutor 10 days before the disposition hearing. The notice shall include the amount of time the defendant is claiming. The defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the credit claimed meets the requirements of this section. A court may not consider, except for good cause, a request for credit made under this subsection more than 90 days after the disposition hearing.

To qualify as a treatment program under this section, a program must

be intended to address criminogenic traits or behaviors;

provide measures of progress or completion; and

require notification to the prosecuting authority, pretrial services officer, or probation officer if the person is discharged from the program for noncompliance.

Unless the defendant participated in a residential treatment program under (c) and (f) of this section while under electronic monitoring, a court may not grant credit against a sentence of imprisonment under (d) of this section if the sentence is for

a felony crime against a person under AS 11.41;

a crime involving domestic violence as defined in AS

18.66.990

;

an offense under AS 11.71 involving the delivery of a controlled substance to a person under 19 years of age;

burglary in the first degree under AS

11.46.300

; or

arson in the first degree under AS

11.46.400

.

Nothing in this section authorizes the release of a person on electronic monitoring after conviction and while awaiting sentencing if the person is ineligible for release under AS

12.30.040(b)

.

A court may not grant credit under this section for time spent in a treatment program or under electronic monitoring for a sex offense as defined in AS

12.63.100

.

A court may grant credit under this section for time spent in a treatment program or under electronic monitoring if the court finds that the sentence, including credit toward the sentence of imprisonment, meets the requirements of AS

12.55.005

.

When a court grants credit toward a sentence of imprisonment under this section, if a defendant spends time in a treatment program while under electronic monitoring, the court may grant credit for either the time spent in the treatment program or for the time spent under electronic monitoring, but not for both.

A court granting credit against a sentence of imprisonment under (a) of this section may grant credit of not more than 365 days against the total term of imprisonment imposed.

History.

(§ 20 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 19 ch 43 SLA 2013; am § 23 ch 83 SLA 2014; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 20 SLA 2015; am §§
68 — 71 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 29 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§
6, 7 ch 11 SLA 2019; am §§
65, 66 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (

l

) was enacted as (i). Relettered in 2019.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(c), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (e).

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (c), in the introductory language, substituted “for a day” for “for time”, and inserted “on that day” following “a person’s liberty”, rewrote (c)(2), which read, “must be confined at all times to the grounds of the facility or be in the physical custody of an employee of the facility, except for court appearances, meetings with counsel, and work required by the treatment program and approved in advance by the court”, added (c)(2)(D).

The 2015 amendment, effective August 12, 2015, in (a), inserted “or under electronic monitoring” following “time spent in a treatment program”; rewrote (d), which read, “A court may not grant credit against a sentence of imprisonment for time spent in a private residence or under electronic monitoring”; in (e), in the first sentence, inserted “or under electronic monitoring” following “for time spend in a treatment program”.

The 2016 amendment, effective October 9, 2016, in (a), substituted “that furthers the reformation and rehabilitation of the defendant if the court finds that the program places a substantial restriction on the defendant's freedom of movement and behavior and is consistent with” for “or under electronic monitoring only as provided in”; rewrote (b ) and (c); added (f) and (g).

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, added (h).

The first 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, rewrote (g), added (i) through (k).

The second 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (f)(3), substituted “notification to the prosecuting authority, pretrial services officer, or” for “notification to the pretrial services office or”; and added (i) [now (

l

)].

Editor's notes. —

Section 36(a), ch. 24, SLA 2007, provides that this section “applies to credit for time served for a sentence imposed on or after July 1, 2007, regardless of when the criminal act was committed.”

Under sec. 46(d), ch. 43, SLA 2013, subsection (e), added by sec. 19, ch. 43, SLA 2013, applies to disposition hearings occurring in proceedings on petitions to revoke probation filed on or after July 1, 2013.

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (c) as amended by sec. 23, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Under sec. 5(a),
ch. 20, SLA 2015, the changes made to subsections (a), (d), and (e) in secs. 1 — 3,
ch. 20, SLA 2015 apply to “an offense committed before, on, or after August 12, 2015.”

Section 11,
ch. 11, SLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of (i) — (k) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after October 17, 2019.”

Section 142(b)(3),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment to (i) [now (

l

)] of this section applies to “sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019 for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 12.55.030.
Discharge of indigents imprisoned for nonpayment of fine. [Repealed, § 16 ch 53 SLA 1973.]

Sec. 12.55.035.
Fines.

Upon conviction of an offense, a defendant may be sentenced to pay a fine as authorized in this section or as otherwise authorized by law.

Upon conviction of an offense, a defendant who is not an organization may be sentenced to pay, unless otherwise specified in the provision of law defining the offense, a fine of not more than

$500,000 for murder in the first or second degree, attempted murder in the first degree, murder of an unborn child, sexual assault in the first degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree, kidnapping, sex trafficking in the first degree under AS

11.66.110(a)(2)

, or misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first degree;

$250,000 for a class A felony;

$100,000 for a class B felony;

$50,000 for a class C felony;

$25,000 for a class A misdemeanor;

$2,000 for a class B misdemeanor;

$500 for a violation.

Upon conviction of an offense, a defendant that is an organization may be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding the greatest of

an amount that is

$2,500,000 for a felony offense or for a misdemeanor offense that results in death;

$500,000 for a class A misdemeanor offense that does not result in death;

$75,000 for a class B misdemeanor offense that does not result in death;

$25,000 for a violation;

three times the pecuniary gain

realized by the defendant as a result of the offense; or

sought by the defendant for the defendant or for others by the commission of the offense; or

three times the pecuniary damage or loss

caused by the defendant to another, or to the property of another, as a result of the offense; or

to another or the property of another sought by the defendant by the commission of the offense.

If a defendant is sentenced to pay a fine, the court may grant permission for the payment to be made within a specified period of time or in specified installments.

In imposing a fine under (c) of this section, in addition to any other relevant factors, the court shall consider

measures taken by the organization to discipline an officer, director, employee, or agent of the organization;

measures taken by the organization to prevent a recurrence of the offense;

the organization’s obligation to make restitution to a victim of the offense, and the extent to which imposition of a fine will impair the ability of the organization to make restitution; and

the extent to which the organization will pass on to consumers the expense of the fine.

In imposing a fine, the court may not reduce the fine by the amount of a surcharge or otherwise consider the applicability of a surcharge to the offense.

Fines imposed and collected under this section shall be separately accounted for under AS

37.05.142

.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 110 SLA 2010.]

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 17 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 26 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 85 SLA 1988; am §§ 1, 2 ch 142 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 71 SLA 1992; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 79 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 56 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 131 SLA 2002; am § 7 ch 73 SLA 2006; am § 21 ch 24 SLA 2007; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 33 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 2010; am § 8 ch 58 SLA 2010; am §§ 1, 4 ch 110 SLA 2010; am § 19 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am § 72 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

Definition of “organization” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Sentencing procedures — AS

12.55.025(f)

Enforcement of fines and restitution — AS

12.55.051

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: VI, 49-51.

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (h) of this section was enacted as an uncodified section, sec. 4, ch. 110, SLA 2010, codified in 2010, and repealed effective January 31, 2012 under sec. 5, ch. 110, SLA 2010.

Cross references. —

For classification of offenses, see AS

11.81.250

; for sentences of imprisonment for felonies, see AS

12.55.125

; for sentences of imprisonment for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135

.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to subsection (b), see sec. 185(a)(31), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective September 14, 2006, inserted “murder of an unborn child” in paragraph (b)(1).

The 2007 amendment, effective July 1, 2007, inserted “promoting prostitution in the first degree under AS

11.66.110(a)(2)

” in paragraph (b)(1).

The 2009 amendment, effective September 14, 2009, substituted “Upon” for “Except as provided in AS

12.55.036

, upon”, at the beginning of (a), (b), and (c).

The first 2010 amendment by § 8 ch 58, effective June 10, 2010, in the introductory language of (c), substituted “not exceeding the greatest of” for “not exceeding the greater of”.

The second 2010 amendment by § 1 ch 54, effective September 7, 2010, in (c)(1)(A), substituted “$2,500,000” for “$1, 000,000”, in (c)(1)(B), substituted “$500,000” for “$200,000”, in (c)(1)(C), substituted “$75,000” for “$25,000”, in (c)(1)(D), substituted “$25,000” for “$10,000”; in (c)(2), added the (A) and (B) designations, added (c)(2)(B); in (c)(3), added the (A) and (B) designations, added (c)(3)(B).

The third 2010 amendment by § 1 ch 110, effective September 26, 2010, added (g).

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (b)(1), substituted “sex trafficking” for “promoting prostitution”; made a stylistic change.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (b)(5), substituted “$25,000 for “$10,000”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 36(d), ch. 24, SLA 2007, provides that the 2007 amendment of (b) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2007.”

Section 2, ch. 54, SLA 2010, provides that the amendments to (c) of this section made by § 1, ch. 54, SLA 2010 “apply to offenses occurring on or after September 7, 2010.”

Section 27(a), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments to subsection (b) apply to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 12.55.036.
Day fines. [Repealed, § 4 ch 33 SLA 2009.]